Florida, session 2026, SB1102.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 11 212.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 12 212.055âDiscretionary sales surtaxes; legislative intent; 13 authorization and use of proceeds.âIt is the legislative intent 14 that any authorization for imposition of a discretionary sales 15 surtax shall be published in the Florida Statutes as a 16 subsection of this section, irrespective of the duration of the 17 levy. Each enactment shall specify the types of counties 18 authorized to levy; the rate or rates which may be imposed; the 19 maximum length of time the surtax may be imposed, if any; the 20 procedure which must be followed to secure voter approval, if 21 required; the purpose for which the proceeds may be expended; 22 and such other requirements as the Legislature may provide. 23 Taxable transactions and administrative procedures shall be as 24 provided in s. 212.054. 25 (2)âLOCAL GOVERNMENT INFRASTRUCTURE SURTAX.â 26 (d)âThe proceeds of the surtax authorized by this 27 subsection and any accrued interest shall be expended by the 28 school district, within the county and municipalities within the 29 county, or, in the case of a negotiated joint county agreement, 30 within another county, to finance, plan, and construct 31 infrastructure; to acquire any interest in land for public 32 recreation, conservation, or protection of natural resources or 33 to prevent or satisfy private property rights claims resulting 34 from limitations imposed by the designation of an area of 35 critical state concern; to provide loans, grants, or rebates to 36 residential or commercial property owners who make energy 37 efficiency improvements to their residential or commercial 38 property, if a local government ordinance authorizing such use 39 is approved by referendum; or to finance the closure of county 40 owned or municipally owned solid waste landfills that have been 41 closed or are required to be closed by order of the Department 42 of Environmental Protection. Any use of the proceeds or interest 43 for purposes of landfill closure before July 1, 1993, is 44 ratified. The proceeds and any interest may not be used for the 45 operational expenses of infrastructure, except that a county 46 that has a population of fewer than 75,000 and that is required 47 to close a landfill may use the proceeds or interest for long 48 term maintenance costs associated with landfill closure. 49 Counties, as defined in s. 125.011, and charter counties may, in 50 addition, use the proceeds or interest to retire or service 51 indebtedness incurred for bonds issued before July 1, 1987, for 52 infrastructure purposes, and for bonds subsequently issued to 53 refund such bonds. Any use of the proceeds or interest for 54 purposes of retiring or servicing indebtedness incurred for 55 refunding bonds before July 1, 1999, is ratified. 56 1.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term 57 âinfrastructureâ means: 58 a.âAny fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay 59 associated with the construction, reconstruction, or improvement 60 of public facilities that have a life expectancy of 5 or more 61 years, any related land acquisition, land improvement, design, 62 and engineering costs, and all other professional and related 63 costs required to bring the public facilities into service. For 64 purposes of this sub-subparagraph, the term âpublic facilitiesâ 65 means facilities as defined in s. 163.3164(41), s. 163.3221(13), 66 or s. 189.012(5), and includes facilities that are necessary to 67 carry out governmental purposes, including, but not limited to, 68 fire stations, general governmental office buildings, and animal 69 shelters, regardless of whether the facilities are owned by the 70 local taxing authority or another governmental entity. 71 b.âA fire department vehicle, an emergency medical service 72 vehicle, a sheriffâs office vehicle, a police department 73 vehicle, or any other vehicle, and the equipment necessary to 74 outfit the vehicle for its official use or equipment that has a 75 life expectancy of at least 5 years. 76 c.âAny expenditure for the construction, lease, or 77 maintenance of, or provision of utilities or security for, 78 facilities, as defined in s. 29.008. 79 d.âAny fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay 80 associated with the improvement of private facilities that have 81 a life expectancy of 5 or more years and that the owner agrees 82 to make available for use on a temporary basis as needed by a 83 local government as a public emergency shelter or a staging area 84 for emergency response equipment during an emergency officially 85 declared by the state or by the local government under s. 86 252.38. Such improvements are limited to those necessary to 87 comply with current standards for public emergency evacuation 88 shelters. The owner must enter into a written contract with the 89 local government providing the improvement funding to make the 90 private facility available to the public for purposes of 91 emergency shelter at no cost to the local government for a 92 minimum of 10 years after completion of the improvement, with 93 the provision that the obligation will transfer to any 94 subsequent owner until the end of the minimum period. 95 e.âAny land acquisition expenditure for a residential 96 housing project in which at least 30 percent of the units are 97 affordable to individuals or families whose total annual 98 household income does not exceed 120 percent of the area median 99 income adjusted for household size, if the land is owned by a 100 local government or by a special district that enters into a 101 written agreement with the local government to provide such 102 housing. The local government or special district may enter into 103 a ground lease with a public or private person or entity for 104 nominal or other consideration for the construction of the 105 residential housing project on land acquired pursuant to this 106 sub-subparagraph. 107 f.âInstructional technology used solely in a school 108 districtâs classrooms. As used in this sub-subparagraph, the 109 term âinstructional technologyâ means an interactive device that 110 assists a teacher in instructing a class or a group of students 111 and includes the necessary hardware and software to operate the 112 interactive device. The term also includes support systems in 113 which an interactive device may mount and is not required to be 114 affixed to the facilities. 115 g.âEquipment, software, and storage necessary to allow a 116 law enforcement agency to begin, or continue, the use of body 117 cameras under s. 943.1718. 118 2.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term âenergy 119 efficiency improvementâ means any energy conservation and 120 efficiency improvement that reduces consumption through 121 conservation or a more efficient use of electricity, natural 122 gas, propane, or other forms of energy on the property, 123 including, but not limited to, air sealing; installation of 124 insulation; installation of energy-efficient heating, cooling, 125 or ventilation systems; installation of solar panels; building 126 modifications to increase the use of daylight or shade; 127 replacement of windows; installation of energy controls or 128 energy recovery systems; installation of electric vehicle 129 charging equipment; installation of systems for natural gas fuel 130 as defined in s. 206.9951; and installation of efficient 131 lighting equipment. 132 3.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, 133 a local government infrastructure surtax imposed or extended 134 after July 1, 1998, may allocate up to 15 percent of the surtax 135 proceeds for deposit into a trust fund within the countyâs 136 accounts created for the purpose of funding economic development 137 projects having a general public purpose of improving local 138 economies, including the funding of operational costs and 139 incentives related to economic development. The ballot statement 140 must indicate the intention to make an allocation under the 141 authority of this subparagraph. 142 4.âSurtax revenues that are shared with eligible charter 143 schools pursuant to paragraph (c) shall be allocated among such 144 schools based on each schoolâs proportionate share of total 145 school district capital outlay full-time equivalent enrollment 146 as adopted by the education estimating conference established in 147 s. 216.136. Surtax revenues must be expended by the charter 148 school in a manner consistent with the allowable uses provided 149 in s. 1013.62(4). All revenues and expenditures shall be 150 accounted for in a charter schoolâs monthly or quarterly 151 financial statement pursuant to s. 1002.33(9). If a schoolâs 152 charter is not renewed or is terminated and the school is 153 dissolved under the provisions of law under which the school was 154 organized, any unencumbered funds received under this paragraph 155 shall revert to the sponsor. 156 Section 2.âThe amendment made by this act to s. 157 212.055(2)(d), Florida Statutes, authorizing additional uses of 158 surtax proceeds applies to a surtax in effect on the date this 159 act becomes a law only to the extent such use was authorized in 160 the original referendum adopting the surtax or is authorized 161 pursuant to a subsequent resolution conditioned to take effect 162 only upon approval of a majority vote of the electors of the 163 county voting in a referendum. 164 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.